District of Columbia statutes.
31-5605.04

Misleading filings.

A person shall not make, or cause to be made, in a document filed with the Commissioner or in any proceeding under this chapter, a statement which is, at the time and in the light of the circumstances under which it is made, false or misleading in any material respect.

History

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 504, 47 DCR 7837

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-5606.04.